Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.250.070

Rights of students to attend nonresident school district for the purposes of enrolling in alternative learning experience programs—Standard release form.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to diminish the rights of students to attend a nonresident school district in accordance with RCW 28A.225.220 through 28A.225.230 for the purposes of enrolling in alternative learning experience programs. The office of online learning under RCW 28A.250.030 shall develop a standard form, which must be used by all school districts, for releasing a student to a nonresident school district for the purposes of enrolling in an alternative learning experience program.

[ 2017 c 291 s 8; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 508; 2009 c 542 s 8.]

NOTES:

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.